Utah statutes.
17D-1-209.   Notice and plat to lieutenant governor -- Recording
requirements -- Effective date.
(1)  The legislative body adopting a resolution or ordinance approving the
creation of a special service district shall:
(a)  within 30 days after adopting the resolution or ordinance, file with the
lieutenant governor:
(i)  a copy of a notice of an impending boundary action, as defined in Section
67-1a-6.5, that meets the requirements of Subsection 67-1a-6.5(3); and
(ii)  a copy of an approved final local entity plat, as defined in Section
67-1a-6.5; and
(b)  upon the lieutenant governor's issuance of a certificate of incorporation
under Section 67-1a-6.5, submit to the recorder of the county in which the
special service district is located:
(i)  the original notice of an impending boundary action;
(ii)  the original certificate of incorporation;
(iii)  the original approved final local entity plat; and
(iv)  a certified copy of the resolution or ordinance approving the creation
of the special service district.
(2) (a)  Upon the lieutenant governor's issuance of a certificate of creation
under Section 67-1a-6.5, the special service district is created and
incorporated.
(b) (i)  The effective date of a special service district's incorporation for
purposes of assessing property within the special service district is governed
by Section 59-2-305.5.
(ii)  Until the documents listed in Subsection (1)(b) are recorded in the
office of the recorder of the county in which the property is located:
(A)  the county, city, or town that created the special service district may
not levy or collect a property tax for special service district purposes on
property within the special service district; and
(B)  the special service district may not:
(I)  levy or collect an assessment on property within the special service
district; or
(II)  charge or collect a fee for service provided to property within the
special service district.
